Missouri, session 2026, HB3396.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 347.035, 347.163, 351.385, 351.386, 351.395, 351.572,
351.1036, 355.131, 355.141, 355.771, 357.010, 358.150, 358.440, 359.251, and 359.551,
RSMo, are repealed and twenty-five new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
sections 347.035, 347.163, 351.385, 351.386, 351.395, 351.572, 351.1036, 351.1400,
351.1401, 351.1402, 351.1403, 351.1406, 351.1408, 351.1410, 351.1412, 351.1415,
351.1418, 355.131, 355.141, 355.771, 357.010, 358.150, 358.440, 359.251, and 359.551,
to read as follows:
347.035. A limited liability company may be organized under sections 347.010 to
347.187 and may conduct or promote any lawful businesses or purposes within this state or
any other jurisdiction. The lawful businesses or purposes authorized under this section
do not include political spending power as defined under section 351.1401.
347.163. 1. Every foreign limited liability company now transacting business in or
which may hereafter transact business in this state which shall neglect or fail to comply with
the provisions of section 347.153 shall be subject to a fine of not less than one thousand
dollars. If the secretary is advised that a foreign limited liability company is transacting
business within this state in contravention of sections 347.010 to 347.187, the secretary shall
report the fact to the prosecuting attorney of any county in which the limited liability
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3396 2
company is transacting business, and the prosecuting attorney shall, as soon thereafter as is
practical, institute proceedings to recover the fine prescribed in this section. In addition to
such penalty, no foreign limited liability company failing to comply with sections 347.010 to
347.187 may maintain any suit or action, either legal or equitable, in any of the courts of this
state, upon any demand, whether arising out of contract or tort, while the requirements of
sections 347.010 to 347.187 have not been met.
2. The failure of a foreign limited liability company to register in this state does not
impair the validity of any contract or act of the foreign limited liability company or prevent
the foreign limited liability company from defending any action, suit or proceeding in any
court of this state.
3. A member of a foreign limited liability company is not liable for any debts,
obligations or liabilities of the foreign limited liability company solely by reason of having
transacted business in this state without registration.
4. A foreign limited liability company, by transacting business in this state without
registration, shall be subject to the provisions of sections 506.500 to 506.520 with respect to
causes of actions arising out of the transaction of business in this state.
5. Without excluding other activities which may not constitute transacting business in
this state, a foreign limited liability company shall not be considered to be transacting
business in this state, for purposes of sections 347.010 to 347.187, by reason of carrying on in
this state any one or more of the following activities:
(1) Maintaining or defending any action or suit or any administrative or arbitration
proceeding, or effecting the settlement thereof or the settlement of claims or disputes;
(2) Holding meetings of its members or carrying on other activities concerning its
internal affairs;
(3) Maintaining bank accounts;
(4) Borrowing money or creating evidence of debt, mortgage or lien on or other
security interest in real or personal property;
(5) Securing or collecting debts or enforcing any rights in properties securing the
same;
(6) Transacting any business in interstate commerce; or
(7) Conducting an isolated transaction completed within a period of thirty days and
not in the course of a number of repeated transactions of a like nature.
6. A foreign corporation, as defined in section 351.015 or section 355.066, shall not
be deemed to be transacting business in this state for the purposes of section 351.572 solely
for the reason that it is a member of a limited liability company.
7. A foreign limited partnership or foreign registered limited liability limited
partnership, as defined in section 359.011, shall not be deemed to be transacting business in

HB 3396 3
this state for the purposes of section 359.551 solely for the reason that it is a member of a
limited liability company.
8. A foreign limited liability company as defined in sections 347.010 to 347.187 shall
not be deemed to be transacting business in this state for the purposes of this section, solely
for the reason that it is a member of a limited liability company.
9. A foreign registered limited liability partnership, as defined in section 358.020,
shall not be deemed to be transacting business in this state for the purposes of section 351.572
solely for the reason that it is a member of a limited liability company.
10. The provisions of this section do not apply in determining the context or activities
which may subject a foreign limited liability company to service of process, suit, taxation or
regulation under any other statute of this state.
11. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 5 of this section and any other
provision of law, an entity organized or existing under the laws of another jurisdiction
that directly or indirectly undertakes, finances, or directs acts constituting political
spending power as defined under section 351.1401 in this state is conclusively deemed to
be transacting business in this state for purposes of jurisdiction and enforcement.
351.385. Each corporation shall have power:
(1) To have succession by its corporate name for the period limited in its articles of
incorporation or perpetually where there is no such limitations;
(2) To sue and be sued, complain and defend in any court of law or equity;
(3) To have a corporate seal which may be altered at pleasure and to use the same by
causing it or a facsimile thereof to be impressed or affixed or in any manner reproduced;
(4) To purchase, take, receive, lease, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, improve, use
and otherwise deal in, sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, transfer and otherwise
dispose of all or any part of its real or personal property, or any interest therein, or other
assets, wherever situated; and to hold for any period of time, real estate acquired in payment
of a debt, by foreclosure or otherwise, or real estate exchanged therefor;
(5) To be a general or limited partner;
(6) To purchase, take, receive, subscribe for, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, vote,
use, employ, sell, mortgage, loan, pledge, or otherwise dispose of, and otherwise use and deal
in and with, shares or other interests in, or obligations of, other domestic or foreign
corporations, associations, partnerships, or individuals, or direct or indirect obligations of the
United States or of any other government, state, territory, governmental district or
municipality or of any instrumentality thereof;
(7) To make contracts and guarantees, including but not limited to guarantees of the
capital stock, bonds, other securities, evidences of indebtedness and other debts and
obligations issued by any other corporation of this or any other state, or issued by any state or

HB 3396 4
any political subdivision thereof; to incur liabilities; to borrow money at such rates of interest
as the corporation may determine without regard to the restrictions of any usury law of this
state; to issue its notes, bonds, and other obligations; to issue notes or bonds, secured or
unsecured, which by their terms are convertible into shares of stock of any class, upon such
terms and conditions and at such rates or prices as may be provided in such notes or bonds
and the indenture or mortgage under which they are issued; and to secure any of its
obligations by mortgage, pledge, or deed of trust of all or any of its property, franchises, and
income;
(8) To invest its surplus funds from time to time and to lend money and to take and
hold real and personal property as security for the payment of funds so invested or loaned;
(9) To conduct its business, carry on its operations, and have offices within and
without this state, and to exercise in any other state, territory, district, or possession of the
United States, or in any foreign country, the powers granted by this chapter;
(10) To elect or appoint directors, officers and agents of the corporation, define their
duties and fix their compensation, and to indemnify directors, officers and employees to the
extent and in the manner permitted by law;
(11) To make and alter bylaws, not inconsistent with its articles of incorporation or
with the laws of this state, for the administration and regulation of the affairs of the
corporation, and to adopt emergency bylaws and exercise emergency powers as permitted by
law;
(12) To transact any lawful business in aid of the United States in the prosecution of
war, to make donations to associations and organizations aiding in war activities, and to lend
money to the state or federal government for war purposes;
(13) To cease its corporate activities and surrender its corporate franchise;
(14) To have and exercise all powers necessary or convenient to effect any or all of
the purposes for which the corporation is formed;
(15) To make contributions to any corporation organized for civic, charitable,
benevolent, scientific or educational purposes, or to any incorporated or unincorporated
association, community chest or community fund, not operated or used for profit to its
members but operated for the purposes of raising funds for and of distributing funds to other
civic, charitable, benevolent, scientific or educational organizations or agencies;
(16) To renounce, in its articles of incorporation or by action of its board of directors,
any interest or expectancy of the corporation in, or in being offered an opportunity to
participate in, specified business opportunities or specified classes or categories of business
opportunities that are presented to the corporation, or one or more of its officers, directors,
employees, agents, or stockholders.

HB 3396 5
(17) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, no power granted
under this section includes political spending power as defined under section 351.1401.
Political spending power shall not be deemed necessary or convenient under any
circumstances including under subdivision (14) of this section. An act constituting
political spending power is ultra vires and void as provided in section 351.1408 and
results in forfeiture of charter privileges as provided in section 351.1410.
351.386. 1. Every corporation incorporated under this chapter may engage in any
lawful business unless a more limited purpose is set forth in the articles of incorporation;
however, the corporation shall not be restricted to this limited purpose, unless it has stated it is
so restricted in its articles of incorporation.
2. A corporation engaging in a business that is subject to regulation under another
statute of this state may incorporate under this chapter only if permitted by, and subject to all
limitations of, the other statute.
3. For purposes of this section, "lawful business" does not include political
spending power as defined under section 351.1401.
351.395. 1. No act of a corporation and no conveyance or transfer of real or personal
property to or by a corporation shall be invalid by reason of the fact that the corporation was
without capacity or power to do such act or to make or receive such conveyance or transfer,
but such lack of capacity or power may be asserted:
(1) In a proceeding by a shareholder against the corporation to enjoin the doing of any
act or acts or the transfer of real or personal property by or to the corporation. If the
unauthorized acts or transfer sought to be enjoined are being, or are to be, performed or made
pursuant to any contract to which the corporation is a party, the court may, if all of the parties
to the contract are parties to the proceeding and if it deems the same to be equitable, set aside
and enjoin the performance of such contract, and in so doing may allow to the corporation or
to the other parties to the contract, as the case may be, compensation for the loss or damage
sustained by either of them which may result from the action of the court in setting aside and
enjoining the performance of such contract, but anticipated profits to be derived from the
performance of the contract shall not be awarded by the court as a loss or damage sustained;
(2) In a proceeding by the corporation, whether acting directly or through a receiver,
trustee, or other legal representative, or through shareholders in a representative suit, against
the incumbent or former officers or directors of the corporation;
(3) In a proceeding by the attorney general, as provided in this chapter, to dissolve the
corporation, or in a proceeding by the attorney general to enjoin the corporation from the
transaction of unauthorized business.

HB 3396 6
2. This section does not apply to an act constituting political spending power as
defined under section 351.1401. Any such act is ultra vires and void under section
351.1408.
351.572. 1. A foreign corporation may not transact business in this state until it
obtains a certificate of authority from the secretary of state.
2. The following activities, among others, do not constitute transacting business
within the meaning of subsection 1 of this section:
(1) Maintaining, defending, or settling any proceeding;
(2) Holding meetings of the board of directors or shareholders or carrying on other
activities concerning internal corporate affairs;
(3) Maintaining bank accounts;
(4) Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange, and registration of the
corporation's own securities or maintaining trustees or depositories with respect to those
securities;
(5) Creating or acquiring indebtedness, mortgages, and security interests in real or
personal property;
(6) Securing or collecting debts or enforcing mortgages and security interests in
property securing the debts;
(7) Conducting an isolated transaction that is completed within thirty days and that is
not one in the course of repeated transactions of a like nature;
(8) Transacting business in interstate commerce.
3. The list of activities in subsection 2 of this section is not exhaustive.
4. Notwithstanding subsection 2 of this section and any other provision of law, an
entity organized or existing under the laws of another jurisdiction that directly or
indirectly undertakes, finances, or directs acts constituting political spending power as
defined under section 351.1401 in this state is conclusively deemed to be transacting
business in this state for purposes of jurisdiction and enforcement.
351.1036. 1. In addition to other powers, a cooperative as an agent or otherwise:
(1) May perform every act necessary or proper to conduct of the cooperative's
business or accomplish the purposes of the cooperative;
(2) Has all other rights, powers, or privileges granted by the laws of this state to any
business entity, except those that are inconsistent with the express provisions of sections
351.1000 to 351.1228; [and]
(3) Has the powers given in this section; and
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of sections 351.1000 to 351.1228, no
right, power, or privilege described in this subsection includes political spending power
as defined in section 351.1401, except as expressly provided by law for political

HB 3396 7
committees. Political spending power may not be deemed necessary or proper under
any circumstances.
2. The cooperative may act as the agent of its members, either collectively or
individually, in the negotiation for and procurement of all goods, services, and programs
which may be provided to the members by or through the cooperative, provided, however,
that unless the cooperative has affirmatively accepted responsibility, the cooperative shall
have no liability for its members' failure, whether collective or individual, to perform or pay
for such goods, services or programs.
3. A cooperative may enter into or become a party to a contract or agreement for the
cooperative or for or on behalf of the members or patrons, including but not limited to,
contracts related to prices for and types of products, goods, or services to be supplied or sold
to the members, goods manufactured and sold by the members through the cooperative, the
management of the cooperative by a third party manager, and any other contract deemed by
the board to be in the best interests of the cooperative or the members, or between the
cooperative and its members.
4. (1) A cooperative may purchase and hold, lease, mortgage, encumber, sell,
exchange, and convey as a legal entity property of any kind including but not limited to real
property, personal property, intellectual property, real estate, buildings, equipment, products,
patents, and copyrights as the business of the cooperative may require, including the sale or
other disposition of assets required by the business of the cooperative as determined by the
board.
(2) A cooperative may take, receive, and hold real and personal property, including
the principal and interest of money or other funds and rights in a contract, for any purpose not
inconsistent with the purposes of the cooperative as set forth in its articles or bylaws, or as
otherwise determined by the board.
5. A cooperative may own, lease, construct, and develop buildings or other structures
or facilities on the property owned or leased by the cooperative or on a right-of-way legally
acquired by the cooperative.
6. A cooperative may issue bonds, debentures, or other evidence of indebtedness and
may borrow money, may secure any of its obligations by mortgage of or creation of a security
interest in or other encumbrances or assignment of all or any of its property, or income, and
may issue guarantees for any legal purpose.
7. A cooperative may make advances to its members or patrons on products or
services delivered by the members or patrons to the cooperative.
8. A cooperative may accept donations or deposits of money, real property, or
personal property from other cooperatives or associations from which it is constituted, and
from members.

HB 3396 8
9. A cooperative may loan money to and borrow money from members, cooperatives,
or associations from which it is constituted with security that it considers sufficient. A
cooperative may invest and reinvest its funds.
10. A cooperative may pay pensions, retirement allowances, and compensation for
past services to and for the benefit of and establish, maintain, continue, and carry out, wholly
or partially at the expense of the cooperative, employee or incentive benefit plans, trusts, and
provisions to or for the benefit of any or all of its and its related organizations' officers,
managers, directors, employees, and agents; and in the case of a related organization that is a
cooperative, members who provide services or goods to that cooperative, and any of their
families, dependents, and beneficiaries. It may indemnify and purchase and maintain
insurance for and on behalf of a fiduciary of any of these employee benefit and incentive
plans, trusts, and provisions.
11. A cooperative may provide, directly or indirectly, insurance of any kind, including
but not limited to disability insurance, health insurance, casualty insurance, unemployment
insurance, life insurance, and other insurance to or for the benefit of any or all of its
employees, officers, directors, members, managers, or their respective directors, officers,
employees, and agents. The cooperative may own directly or indirectly insurance of any
kind, including but not limited to disability insurance, health insurance, casualty insurance,
unemployment insurance, life insurance, and other insurance on any or all of its employees,
officers, directors, members, managers, or their respective directors, officers, employees, and
agents.
12. (1) A cooperative may purchase, acquire, hold, or dispose of the ownership
interests of another business entity or form or otherwise organize subsidiary or affiliated
business entities, and assume all rights, interests, privileges, responsibilities, and obligations
arising out of all such ownership interests.
(2) The cooperative may form special purpose business entities to secure and hold
assets of the cooperative.
(3) A cooperative may purchase, own, and hold ownership interests, including stock
and other equity interests, memberships, interests in nonstock capital, and evidences of
indebtedness of any business entity.
351.1400. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Missouri
Corporate Power Reset Act".
351.1401. For purposes of sections 351.1400 to 351.1418, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Artificial person", an entity whose existence, legal status, or limited liability
is conferred by the laws of this state, including an entity organized or existing under the

HB 3396 9
laws of another jurisdiction that is authorized to transact business, is otherwise
transacting business, or holds property in this state;
(2) "Artificial-person powers", the powers necessary or convenient for an
artificial person to carry out lawful business, or charitable, cooperative, or
organizational purposes as provided by Missouri law, excluding political spending
power. Political spending power shall not be deemed necessary or convenient under any
circumstances;
(3) "Charter privileges", any legal benefit that exists only because this state
confers such privileges on an artificial person including limited liability, perpetual
duration, succession in entity name, or any statutory limitation on personal liability;
(4) "Political spending power", the legal capacity to pay, contribute, expend,
transfer, or disburse moneys or anything of value to support or oppose:
(a) A candidate, political party, or political committee in an election held in this
state; or
(b) An initiative, referendum, recall, constitutional amendment, charter
amendment, or any other question formally certified or submitted to the electors of
this state or any political subdivision of this state.

The term "political spending power" does not include the distribution of bona fide
news, commentary, or editorial content unless the publishing entity is owned or
controlled by a political party, a political committee, or a candidate.
351.1402. An entity organized or existing under the laws of another jurisdiction
that directly or indirectly undertakes, finances, or directs acts constituting political
spending power in this state is conclusively deemed to be transacting business in this
state for purposes of jurisdiction and enforcement.
351.1403. 1. The creation and continued existence of an artificial person is not a
right but a conditional grant of legal status by the state and remains subject to complete
withdrawal at any time. All powers previously granted to artificial persons under the
laws of this state are revoked in their entirety. An artificial person operating under the
jurisdiction of this state shall possess no power unless specifically granted by this
section.
2. Unless the organizational documents provide otherwise, every artificial person
has perpetual duration and succession in its name and is hereby granted the artificial-
person powers necessary or convenient to carry out its lawful business, charitable,
cooperative, or organizational purposes, excluding any power to directly or indirectly
exercise political spending power as defined under section 351.1401.

HB 3396 10
3. The absence of political spending power is a condition of state-conferred legal
status and charter privileges. An artificial person that exercises political spending
power not extended by the state acts outside the powers granted.
351.1406. 1. Sections 351.1400 to 351.1418 shall apply to:
(1) All artificial persons formed, organized, or existing under the laws of this
state;
(2) Any artificial person organized under the laws of another jurisdiction that is
authorized to transact business, is otherwise transacting business, or holds property in
this state; and
(3) Any trust, statutory trust, business trust, or similar arrangement to the
extent the laws of this state confer limited liability, perpetual duration, succession in
name, or any other charter privilege by reason of that organizational form.
2. Sections 351.1400 to 351.1418 shall not apply to:
(1) Natural persons acting solely in an individual capacity;
(2) The state or any agency, authority, or political subdivision of the state; or
(3) Any public body corporate and politic expressly identified as such under the
laws of this state.
3. Sections 351.1400 to 351.1418 shall not restrict the lawful activities of political
committees organized and regulated under the election laws of this state or under
federal law. Political spending power may be exercised by political committees
organized and regulated under the election laws of this state or under federal law, as
provided under the provisions of the applicable state or federal law.
351.1408. 1. An act by an artificial person that constitutes an exercise of political
spending power not extended by this state is ultra vires and void.
2. An act described in subsection 1 of this section:
(1) Is void ab initio;
(2) Shall not be ratified, validated, or given effect by consent, waiver, estoppel,
reliance, course of dealing, or any other equitable doctrine; and
(3) Creates no enforceable rights, obligations, or defenses.
3. The character of an act that is beyond the scope of authority under this section
arises solely from the absence of political spending power, as a condition of state-
conferred legal status and charter privileges.
4. A provision contained in the articles of incorporation, articles of organization,
partnership agreements, operating agreements, bylaws, trust instruments, or other
organizational documents purporting to grant or confer political spending power is
void.

HB 3396 11
351.1410. 1. An artificial person that exercises political spending power not
extended by the state forfeits all charter privileges as a matter of law.
2. Charter privileges forfeited under subsection 1 of this section include, but are
not limited to, limited liability, perpetual duration, succession in entity name, and any
statutory limitation on personal liability conferred by the laws of this state.
3. Forfeiture under the provisions of this section applies only to charter
privileges conferred by the laws of this state and does not purport to affect privileges
conferred by the laws of another jurisdiction.
4. An artificial person whose charter privileges are forfeited under this section
may be reinstated only under procedures administered by the state and only upon:
(1) Full disgorgement of all moneys or items of value expended, contributed,
transferred, or disbursed in the exercise of political spending power;
(2) Certification of future compliance with sections 351.1400 to 351.1418; and
(3) Satisfaction of any additional conditions that are authorized by law.
351.1412. 1. The secretary of state shall have the power and authority as is
reasonably necessary to enable the secretary of state to administer sections 351.1400 to
351.1418 efficiently and to perform the duties therein imposed upon the secretary of
state. The secretary of state may adopt rules necessary to implement forfeiture of
charter privileges, reinstatement, disgorgement, certification of compliance, notice and
opportunity to be heard consistent with due process. Any rule or portion of a rule, as
that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
2. The attorney general has the authority and responsibility to bring actions to
enforce the provisions of sections 351.1400 to 351.1418 including actions seeking
declaratory relief, injunctive relief, disgorgement, confirmation of forfeiture of charter
privileges, revocation of an artificial person's charter or authority to transact business
in this state, and confirmation or enforcement of forfeiture.
3. The authority conferred to the attorney general under subsection 2 of this
section is in addition to any other powers and duties exercised by the attorney general's
office under the law.
351.1415. 1. The powers of an artificial person under the laws of this state are
limited to artificial-person powers under sections 351.1400 to 351.1418.

HB 3396 12
2. No provision of the laws of this state shall be construed to extend political
spending power to an artificial person except as expressly provided by law for political
committees.
3. Any grant of power, authority, or capacity to an artificial person that would
otherwise be construed to include political spending power is superseded by the
provisions of sections 351.1400 to 351.1418, and shall be given no effect.
351.1418. 1. Sections 351.1400 to 351.1418 shall not be construed to invalidate,
impair, or modify any contract, debt instrument, security, or other legal obligation
lawfully entered into before January 1, 2027.
2. The exercise of political spending power as defined under section 351.1401
shall not be granted after January 1, 2027.
3. A power, privilege, or capacity withdrawn or not extended under sections
351.1400 to 351.1418 shall not be revived, reinstated, or implied by operation of law or
judicial construction.
4. If any portion of sections 351.1400 to 351.1418 are held invalid, an artificial
person shall possess no powers whatsoever and shall not acquire political spending
power as defined under section 351.1401.
355.131. Unless its articles of incorporation provide otherwise, every corporation has
perpetual duration and succession in its corporate name and has the same powers as an
individual to do all things necessary or convenient to carry out its affairs, including, without
limitation, power:
(1) To sue and be sued, complain, and defend in its corporate name;
(2) To have a corporate seal, which may be altered at will, and to use it, or a facsimile
of it, by impressing or affixing or in any other manner reproducing it;
(3) To make and amend bylaws not inconsistent with its articles of incorporation or
with the laws of this state, for regulating and managing the affairs of the corporation;
(4) To purchase, receive, lease, or otherwise acquire, and own, hold, improve, use,
and otherwise deal with, real or personal property, or any legal or equitable interest in
property, wherever located;
(5) To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, and otherwise dispose of all or
any part of its property;
(6) To purchase, receive, subscribe for, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, vote, use,
sell, mortgage, lend, pledge, or otherwise dispose of, and deal in and with, shares or other
interests in, or obligations of, any entity;
(7) To make contracts and guarantees, incur liabilities, borrow money, issue notes,
bonds, and other obligations, and secure any of its obligations by mortgage or pledge of any
of its property, franchises, or income;

HB 3396 13
(8) To lend money, invest and reinvest its funds, and receive and hold real and
personal property as security for repayment, except as limited by section 355.421;
(9) To be a promoter, partner, member, associate or manager of any partnership, joint
venture, trust or other entity;
(10) To conduct its activities, locate offices, and exercise the powers granted by this
chapter within or without this state;
(11) To elect or appoint directors, officers, employees, and agents of the corporation,
define their duties, and fix their compensation;
(12) To pay pensions and establish pension plans, pension trusts, and other benefit
and incentive plans for any or all of its current or former directors, officers, employees, and
agents;
(13) To make donations not inconsistent with law for the public welfare or for
charitable, religious, scientific, or educational purposes and for other purposes that further the
corporate interests;
(14) To impose dues, assessments, admission and transfer fees upon its members;
(15) To establish conditions for admission of members, admit members and issue
memberships;
(16) To carry on a business or businesses, either directly or through one or more for-
profit or nonprofit subsidiary corporations; and
(17) To do all things necessary or convenient, not inconsistent with law, to further the
activities and affairs of the corporation;
(18) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, no power granted by
this section includes political spending power as defined under section 351.1401, except
as expressly provided by law for political committees. Political spending power shall not
be deemed necessary or convenient under any circumstances. An act constituting
political spending power that is not expressly permitted by law for political committees
is ultra vires and void as provided in section 351.1408 and results in forfeiture of charter
privileges as provided in section 351.1410.
355.141. 1. Except as provided in subsection 2 of this section, the validity of
corporate action may not be challenged on the ground that the corporation lacks or lacked
power to act.
2. A corporation's power to act may be challenged in a proceeding against the
corporation to enjoin an act where a third party has not acquired rights. The proceeding may
be brought by the attorney general, a director, or by a member or members in a derivative
proceeding.
3. A corporation's power to act may be challenged in a proceeding against an
incumbent or former director, officer, employee or agent of the corporation. The proceeding

HB 3396 14
may be brought by a director, or by the corporation directly, derivatively, or through a
receiver, a trustee or other legal representative, or in the case of a public benefit corporation,
by the attorney general.
4. This section does not apply to an act constituting political spending power as
defined under section 351.1401. Any such act is ultra vires and void as provided in
section 351.1408.
355.771. 1. A certificate of authority authorizes the foreign corporation to which it is
issued to transact business in this state, subject, however, to the rights of the state to revoke
the certificate as provided in this chapter.
2. A foreign corporation with a valid certificate of authority has the same rights and
enjoys the same privileges as, and except as otherwise provided by this chapter is subject to
the same duties, restrictions, penalties, and liabilities now or later imposed on, a domestic
corporation of like character.
3. This chapter does not authorize this state to regulate the organization or internal
affairs of a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state.
4. A certificate of authority does not authorize a foreign corporation to exercise
political spending power as defined under section 355.1401 in this state, except as
expressly provided by law for political committees. An entity organized or existing
under the laws of another jurisdiction that directly or indirectly undertakes, finances, or
directs acts constituting political spending power as defined under section 351.1401 in
this state is conclusively deemed to be transacting business in this state for purposes of
jurisdiction and enforcement.
357.010. 1. Any number of persons, not less than twelve, may associate themselves
together as a cooperative association, society or exchange, having all the incidents, powers
and privileges of corporations, for the purpose of producing or furnishing goods, services, or
housing, or for the purpose of conducting any agricultural or mercantile business on the
cooperative plan, including the buying, selling, manufacturing, storage, transportation or
other handling or dealing in or with, by associations of agriculturists, of agricultural, dairy or
similar products, and including the manufacturing transformation of such articles into
products derived therefrom, and for the purpose of the purchasing of or selling to all
shareholders and others groceries, provisions and all other articles of merchandise.
2. For the purposes of this section the words "association", "company", "corporation",
"society" or "exchange" shall be construed to mean the same.
3. A corporation, other than a cooperative incorporated under this chapter, may
convert itself into a cooperative, if such corporation can qualify as a cooperative under the
provisions of this chapter, by adopting an amendment to its articles of incorporation by which
it elects to become subject to the provisions of this chapter. Such amendment shall include all

HB 3396 15
information required by section 357.020 and may include any desirable changes permitted by
this chapter. Such amendment shall be adopted, filed and recorded in the manner provided by
law applicable to the corporation prior to such conversion, except that the fee for such
amendment shall be that amount required of a newly formed cooperative as set forth in
section 357.060.
4. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, no incident, power, or
privilege of corporations referenced in this section includes political spending power as
defined under section 351.1401, except as expressly provided by law for political
committees. Political spending power shall not be deemed necessary or convenient
under any circumstances. An act constituting political spending power is ultra vires and
void as provided in section 351.1408 and results in forfeiture of charter privileges as
provided in section 351.1410.
358.150. 1. Except as provided in subsection 2 of this section, all partners are liable
jointly and severally for everything chargeable to the partnership pursuant to sections 358.130
and 358.140, and for all other debts and obligations of the partnership. Any partner may enter
into a separate obligation to perform a partnership contract.
2. Subject to subsection 3 of this section, no partner in a registered limited liability
partnership shall be liable or accountable, directly or indirectly, including by way of
indemnification, contribution, assessment or otherwise, for any debts, obligations and
liabilities of, or chargeable to, the partnership or each other, whether in tort, contract or
otherwise, which are incurred, created or assumed by such partnership while the partnership
is a registered limited liability partnership.
3. Subsection 2 of this section shall not affect the liability of a partner in a registered
limited liability partnership for the partner's own negligence, wrongful acts, omissions,
misconduct or malpractice or the partner's liability for any taxes or fees administered by the
department of revenue pursuant to chapter 143, 144 or 301, and any liabilities owed as
determined by the division of employment security, pursuant to chapter 288, and any local
taxes provided for in section 32.087.
4. A partner is not a proper party to a proceeding by or against a registered limited
liability partnership, the object of which is to recover damages or enforce obligations arising
out of acts, omissions, malpractice or misconduct of the type described in subsection 2 of this
section, unless the partner is personally liable pursuant to subsection 1 or 3 of this section.
5. A registered limited liability partnership may sue and be sued in its own name.
6. Venue of claims against registered limited liability partnerships shall be controlled
pursuant to section 508.010 and, for purposes of venue, a registered limited liability
partnership shall be deemed to be a citizen and resident of the county in which it has any

HB 3396 16
office or agent for the transaction of its usual and customary business activities or in which its
registered office or registered agent is located.
7. Service of process upon a registered limited liability partnership may be had by
delivering a copy of the summons and petition to the partnership's registered agent, a partner,
managing or general agent or by leaving the copies at any business office of the registered
limited liability partnership with the person having charge thereof.
8. An act constituting political spending power as defined under section 351.1401
shall be outside the scope of subsection 2 of this section.
358.440. 1. To register as a limited liability partnership pursuant to this section, a
written application shall be filed with the office of the secretary of state. The application shall
set forth:
(1) The name of the partnership;
(2) The address of a registered office and the name and address of a registered agent
for service of process required to be maintained by section 358.470;
(3) The number of partners in the partnership at the date of application;
(4) A brief statement of the principal business in which the partnership engages;
(5) That the partnership thereby applies for registration as a registered limited liability
partnership; and
(6) Any other information the partnership determines to include in the application.
2. The application shall be signed on behalf of the partnership by a majority of the
partners or by one or more partners authorized by a majority in interest of the partners to sign
the application on behalf of the partnership.
3. The application shall be accompanied by a fee payable to the secretary of state of
twenty-five dollars for each partner of the partnership, but the fee shall not exceed one
hundred dollars. All moneys from the payment of this fee shall be deposited into the general
revenue fund.
4. A person who files a document according to this section as an agent or fiduciary
need not exhibit evidence of the partner's authority as a prerequisite to filing. Any signature
on such document may be a facsimile. If the secretary of state finds that the filing conforms
to law, the secretary of state shall:
(1) Endorse on the copy the word "Filed" and the month, day and year of the filing;
(2) File the original in the secretary of state's office; and
(3) Return the copy to the person who filed it or to the person's representative.
5. A partnership becomes a registered limited liability partnership on the date of the
filing in the office of the secretary of state of an application that, as to form, meets the
requirements of subsections 1 and 2 of this section and that is accompanied by the fee
specified in subsection 3 of this section, or at any later time specified in the application.

HB 3396 17
6. An initial application filed under subsection 1 of this section by a partnership
registered by the secretary of state as a limited liability partnership expires one year after the
date of registration unless earlier withdrawn or revoked or unless renewed in accordance with
subsection 9 of this section.
7. If a person is included in the number of partners of a registered limited liability
partnership set forth in an application, a renewal application or a certificate of amendment of
an application or a renewal application, the inclusion of such person shall not be admissible as
evidence in any action, suit or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative or
investigative, for the purpose of determining whether such person is liable as a partner of such
registered limited liability partnership. The status of a partnership as a registered limited
liability partnership and the liability of a partner of such registered limited liability
partnership shall not be adversely affected if the number of partners stated in an application, a
renewal application or a certificate of amendment of an application or a renewal application is
erroneously stated provided that the application, renewal application or certificate of
amendment of an application or a renewal application was filed in good faith.
8. Any person who files an application or a renewal application in the office of the
secretary of state pursuant to this section shall not be required to file any other documents
pursuant to chapter 417 which requires filing for fictitious names.
9. An effective registration may be renewed before its expiration by filing in duplicate
with the secretary of state an application containing current information of the kind required
in an initial application, including the registration number as assigned by the secretary of
state. The renewal application shall be accompanied by a fee of one hundred dollars on the
date of renewal plus, if the renewal increases the number of partners, fifty dollars for each
partner added, but the fee shall not exceed two hundred dollars. All moneys from such fees
shall be deposited into the general revenue fund. A renewal application filed under this
section continues an effective registration for one year after the date the effective registration
would otherwise expire.
10. A registration may be withdrawn by filing with the secretary of state a written
withdrawal notice signed on behalf of the partnership by a majority of the partners or by one
or more partners authorized by a majority of the partners to sign the notice on behalf of the
partnership. A withdrawal notice shall include the name of the partnership, the date of
registration of the partnership's last application under this section, and a current street address
of the partnership's principal office in this state or outside the state, as applicable. A
withdrawal notice terminates the registration of the partnership as a limited liability
partnership as of the date of filing the notice in the office of the secretary of state. The
withdrawal notice shall be accompanied by a filing fee of twenty dollars.

HB 3396 18
11. If a partnership that has registered pursuant to this section ceases to be registered
as provided in subsection 6 or 10 of this section, that fact shall not affect the status of the
partnership as a registered limited liability partnership prior to the date the partnership ceased
to be registered pursuant to this section.
12. A document filed under this section may be amended or corrected by filing with
the secretary of state articles of amendment, signed by a majority of the partners or by one or
more partners authorized by a majority of the partners. The articles of amendment shall
contain:
(1) The name of the partnership;
(2) The identity of the document being amended;
(3) The part of the document being amended; and
(4) The amendment or correction.

The articles of amendment shall be accompanied by a filing fee of twenty dollars plus, if the
amendment increases the number of partners, fifty dollars for each partner added, but the fee
shall not exceed two hundred dollars; provided that no amendment of an application or a
renewal application is required as a result of a change after the application or renewal
application is filed in the number of partners of the registered limited liability partnership or
in the business in which the registered limited liability partnership engages. All moneys from
such fees shall be deposited into the general revenue fund. The status of a partnership as a
registered limited liability partnership shall not be affected by changes after the filing of an
application or a renewal application in the information stated in the application or renewal
application.
13. No later than ninety days after the happening of any of the following events, an
amendment to an application or a renewal application reflecting the occurrence of the event or
events shall be executed and filed by a majority in interest of the partners or by one or more
partners authorized by a majority of the partners to execute an amendment to the application
or renewal application:
(1) A change in the name of the registered limited liability partnership;
(2) Except as provided in subsections 2 and 3 of section 358.470, a change in the
address of the registered office or a change in the name or address of the registered agent of
the registered limited liability partnership.
14. Unless otherwise provided in this chapter or in the certificate of amendment of an
application or a renewal application, a certificate of amendment of an application or a renewal
100 application or a withdrawal notice of an application or a renewal application shall be effective
101 at the time of its filing with the secretary of state.

HB 3396 19
102 15. The secretary of state may provide forms for the application specified in
103 subsection 1 of this section, the renewal application specified in subsection 9 of this section,
104 the withdrawal notice specified in subsection 10 of this section, and the amendment or
105 correction specified in subsection 12 of this section.
106 16. The secretary of state may remove from its active records the registration of a
107 partnership whose registration has been withdrawn, revoked or has expired.
108 17. The secretary of state may revoke the filing of a document filed under this section
109 if the secretary of state determines that the filing fee for the document was paid by an
110 instrument that was dishonored when presented by the state for payment. The secretary of
111 state shall return the document and give notice of revocation to the filing party by regular
112 mail. Failure to give or receive notice does not invalidate the revocation. A revocation of a
113 filing does not affect an earlier filing.
114 18. If any person signs a document required or permitted to be filed pursuant to
115 sections 358.440 to 358.500 which the person knows is false in any material respect with the
116 intent that the document be delivered on behalf of a partnership to the secretary of state for
117 filing, such person shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor. Unintentional errors in the
118 information set forth in an application filed pursuant to subsection 1 of this section, or
119 changes in the information after the filing of the application, shall not affect the status of a
120 partnership as a registered limited liability partnership.
121 19. Before transacting business in this state, a foreign registered limited liability
122 partnership shall:
123 (1) Comply with any statutory or administrative registration or filing requirements
124 governing the specific type of business in which the partnership is engaged; and
125 (2) Register as a limited liability partnership as provided in this section by filing an
126 application which shall, in addition to the other matters required to be set forth in such
127 application, include a statement:
128 (a) That the secretary is irrevocably appointed the agent of the foreign limited liability
129 partnership for service of process if the limited liability partnership fails to maintain a
130 registered agent in this state or if the agent cannot be found or served with the exercise of
131 reasonable diligence; and
132 (b) Of the address of the office required to be maintained in the jurisdiction of its
133 organization by the laws of that jurisdiction or, if not so required, of the principal office of the
134 foreign limited liability partnership.
135 20. A partnership that registers as a limited liability partnership shall not be deemed
136 to have dissolved as a result thereof and is for all purposes the same partnership that existed
137 before the registration and continues to be a partnership under the laws of this state. If a
138 registered limited liability partnership dissolves, a partnership which is a successor to such

HB 3396 20
139 registered limited liability partnership and which intends to be a registered limited liability
140 partnership shall not be required to file a new registration and shall be deemed to have filed
141 any documents required or permitted under this chapter which were filed by the predecessor
142 partnership.
143 21. Fees mandated in subsection 3 of this section shall be waived if a general partner
144 of the partnership is a member of the Missouri National Guard or any other active duty
145 military, resides in the state of Missouri, and provides proof of such service to the secretary of
146 state.
147 22. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a foreign registered limited
148 liability partnership that directly or indirectly undertakes, finances, or directs acts
149 constituting political spending power as defined under section 351.1401 in this state is
150 conclusively deemed to be transacting business in this state for purposes of jurisdiction
151 and enforcement.
359.251. 1. Except as provided in this chapter or in the partnership agreement, a
general partner of a limited partnership has the rights and powers and is subject to the
restrictions of a partner in a partnership without limited partners.
2. Except as provided in this chapter, a general partner of a limited partnership has the
liabilities of a partner in a partnership without limited partners to persons other than the
partnership and the other partners. Except as provided in this chapter or in the partnership
agreement, a general partner of a limited partnership has the liabilities of a partner in a
partnership without limited partners to the partnership and to the other partners.
3. A limited partnership and any general partner acting in that capacity
possesses no political spending power as defined under section 351.1401. Any act
constituting political spending power is ultra vires and void as provided in section
351.1408 and results in forfeiture of charter privileges as provided in section 351.1410.
359.551. 1. Every foreign limited partnership now doing business in or which may
hereafter do business in this state which shall neglect or fail to comply with the provisions of
section 359.501 shall be subject to a fine of not less than one thousand dollars to be recovered
before any court of competent jurisdiction; and it is hereby made the duty of the secretary of
state immediately after August first of each year, and as often thereafter as the secretary of
state may be advised that limited partnerships are doing business in contravention of this
chapter, to report the fact to the prosecuting attorney of any city or county in which the
limited partnership is doing business and the prosecuting attorney shall, as soon thereafter as
is practicable, institute proceedings to recover the fine herein provided for, which shall go
into the revenue fund of the city or county in which the cause shall accrue; in addition to
which penalty, no foreign limited partnership, failing to comply with this chapter, can
maintain any suit or action, either legal or equitable, in any of the courts of this state, upon

HB 3396 21
any demand, whether arising out of contract or tort, while the requirements of this chapter
have not been complied with.
2. The failure of a foreign limited partnership to register in this state does not impair
the validity of any contract or act of the foreign limited partnership or prevent the foreign
limited partnership from defending any action, suit, or proceeding in any court of this state.
3. A limited partner of a foreign limited partnership is not liable as a general partner
of the foreign limited partnership solely by reason of having transacted business in this state
without registration.
4. A foreign limited partnership, by transacting business in this state without
registration, shall be a firm subject to the provisions of sections 506.500 to 506.520 with
respect to causes of action arising out of the transaction of business in this state.
5. Without excluding other activities which may not constitute transacting business in
this state, a foreign limited partnership shall not be considered to be transacting business in
this state, for the purposes of this chapter, by reason of carrying on in this state any one or
more of the following activities:
(1) Maintaining or defending any action or suit or any administrative or arbitration
proceeding, or effecting the settlement thereof or the settlement of claims or disputes;
(2) Holding meetings of its partners or carrying on other activities concerning its
internal affairs;
(3) Maintaining bank accounts;
(4) Borrowing money or creating evidence of debt, mortgage or lien on or other
security interest in real or personal property;
(5) Securing or collecting debts or enforcing any rights in property securing the same;
(6) Transacting any business in interstate commerce;
(7) Conducting an isolated transaction completed within a period of thirty days and
not in the course of a number of repeated transactions of like nature.
6. A foreign corporation as defined in section 351.015 shall not be deemed to be
transacting business in this state for the purposes of section 351.570 solely for the reason that
it is a partner of a limited partnership.
7. Notwithstanding subsection 5 of this section and any other provision of law, an
entity organized or existing under the laws of another jurisdiction that directly or
indirectly undertakes, finances, or directs acts constituting political spending power as
defined under section 351.1401 in this state is conclusively deemed to be transacting
business in this state for purposes of jurisdiction and enforcement.
Section B. Section A of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
✔